Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-1903] Mauna Kea lands[;] rules. The
board of regents may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to regulate public and
commercial activities on Mauna Kea lands.

In adopting these rules, the board shall:

(1) Strive for consistency with the administrative
rules of the division of forestry and wildlife of the department of land and
natural resources related to forest reserves and natural area reserves;

(2) Consult with the office of Hawaiian affairs to
ensure that these rules shall not affect any right, customarily and
traditionally exercised for subsistence, cultural, and religious purposes and
possessed by ahupuaa tenants who are descendants of native Hawaiians who
inhabited the Hawaiian Islands prior to 1778, subject to the right of the State
to regulate such rights; and

(3) Hold at least one public hearing, in addition to
the public hearing at which decision-making on the proposed rule is made, on
the island of Hawaii. [L 2009, c 132, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next